scripts/hasselbrink2sma.xfscript
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no


! To compile, do:

! With hfst:
! hfst-xfst -F sme2smj-lexeme.xfscript
! The resulting transducer is saved as sme2smj-lexeme.hfst
! and can be used as any other language model, e.g. with
! hfst-lookup sme2smj-lexeme.hfst

! Alternatively, you may use xfst:
! Comment OUT the line for hfst and IN the corresponding
! line for xfst at the end of this file. Then run:
! xfst -e "source sme2smj-lexeme.xfscript "
! Then write
! quit
! The resulting transducer is saved as sme2smj-lexeme.xfst
! and can be used as any other language model, e.g. with
! lookup sme2smj-lexeme.xfst



! ======
! Conversion from North to Lule Sámi
! =======

echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>

define Vow       [ a | á | e | i | o | u | y | æ | ø | å | ä | ö | 
                   A | Á | E | I | O | U | Y | Æ | Ø | Å | Ä | Ö | 
é | ó | ú | í | à | è | ò | ù | ì | ë | ü | ï | â | ê | ô | û | î | ã | ý 
É | Ó | Ú | Í | À | È | Ò | Ù | Ì | Ë | Ü | Ï | Â | Ê | Ô | Û | Î | Ã | Ý |
e7 | o7 ] ;


define Cns [ b | c | č | d | đ | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ŋ | ñ | ń | 
             B | C | Č | D | Đ | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | Ŋ | Ñ | Ń |
             p | q | r | s | š | t | ŧ | v | w | x | z | ž |   
             P | Q | R | S | Š | T | Ŧ | V | W | X | Z | Ž ] ; 


define Syll Cns* Vow+ Cns* ;

echo << Rules >>

! Defining this rule in the beginning, it is so long...

define rd  m b -> m m b ,   m b b -> m b ,
           m p -> m m p ,   m p p -> m p ,
           m s -> m m s ,   m s s -> m s ,
           m š -> m m s j , m š š -> m s j ,

           n c -> n n c ,   n c c -> n c ,
           n d -> n n d ,   n d d -> n d ,
           ŋ g -> ŋ ŋ g ,   ŋ g g -> ŋ g ,
           ŋ k -> ŋ ŋ k ,   ŋ k k -> ŋ k ,
           n s -> n n s ,   n s s -> n s ,
           n t -> n n t ,   n t t -> n t ,
           n v -> n n v ,   n v v -> n v ,
           n s -> n n s ,   n s s -> n s ,
           n z -> n n t s , n z z -> n t s ,
           n ž -> n n t j , n ž ž -> n t j ,

           v d -> v d d ,   v d d -> v d ,
           v g -> v g g ,   v g g -> v g ,
           v j -> v j j ,   v j j -> v j ,
           v k -> v k k ,   v k k -> v k ,
           v l -> v l l ,   v l l -> v l ,
           v p -> v p p ,   v p p -> v p ,
           v r -> v r r ,   v r r -> v r ,
           v s -> v s s ,   v s s -> v s ,
           v t -> v t t ,   v t t -> v t ,
           v č -> v t t j , v č č -> v t j ,
           v š -> v s s j , v š š -> v s j ,
           v z -> v t t s , v z z -> v t s ,
           v ž -> v t t j , v ž ž -> v t j ,

           j b -> j b b ,   j b b -> j b ,
           j c -> j c c ,   j c c -> j c ,
           j d -> j d d ,   j d d -> j d ,
           j f -> j f f ,   j f f -> j f ,
           j g -> j g g ,   j g g -> j g ,
           j k -> j k k ,   j k k -> j k ,
           j p -> j p p ,   j p p -> j p ,
           j s -> j s s ,   j s s -> j s ,
           j t -> j t t ,   j t t -> j t ,
           j v -> j v v ,   j v v -> j v ,
           j z -> j t t s , j z z -> j t s ,
           j ž -> j t t j , j ž ž -> j t j ,
           
           l b -> l b b ,   l b b -> l b ,
           l c -> l c c ,   l c c -> l c ,
           l d -> l l d ,   l d d -> l d ,
           l f -> l f f ,   l f f -> l f ,
           l g -> l g g ,   l g g -> l g ,
           l j -> l j j ,   l j j -> l j ,
           l k -> l k k ,   l k k -> l k ,
           l p -> l p p ,   l p p -> l p ,
           l s -> l s s ,   l s s -> l s ,
           l t -> l l t ,   l t t -> l t ,
           l v -> l v v ,   l v v -> l v ,
           l č -> l t t j , l č č -> l t j ,
           l š -> l s s j , l š š -> l s j ,
           l z -> l l t s , l z z -> l t s ,
           l ž -> l l t j , l ž ž -> l t j ,

           r b -> r b b , r b b -> r b ,
           r c -> r c c , r c c -> r c ,
           r d -> r d d , r d d -> r d ,
           r f -> r f f , r f f -> r f ,
           r g -> r g g , r g g -> r g ,
           r j -> r j j , r j j -> r j ,
           r k -> r k k , r k k -> r k ,
           r p -> r p p , r p p -> r p ,
           r s -> r s s , r s s -> r s ,
           r t -> r t t , r t t -> r t ,
           r v -> r v v , r v v -> r v ,
           r č -> r t t j , r č č -> r t j ,
           r š -> r s s j , r š š -> r s j ,
           r z -> r t t s , r z z -> r t s ,
           r ž -> r t t j , r ž ž -> r t j , 

                            s s k -> s k ,
                            s s t -> s t ,
                            s s m -> s m ,
                            s s p -> s p ,

           š k -> s s j k , š š k -> s j k ,
           š t -> s s j t , š š t -> s j t ,
           š m -> s s j m , š š m -> s j m ,
           š v -> s s j v , š š v -> s j v ,

           đ b -> r b b , đ b b -> r b ,
           đ g -> r g g , đ g g -> r g ,
           đ j -> r j j , đ j j -> r j ,
           đ v -> r v v , đ v v -> r v ,

           j h l -> j h l l , j h l l -> j h l ,
           j h m -> j h m m , j h m m -> j h m ,
           j h n -> j h n n , j h n n -> j h n ,
           v h l -> v h l l , v h l l -> v h l ,

           đ b -> r b b , đ b b -> r b ,
           đ b -> r b b , đ b b -> r b ,
           đ b -> r b b , đ b b -> r b ,
           đ b -> r b b , đ b b -> r b ,
           đ b -> r b b , đ b b -> r b ,
           đ b -> r b b , đ b b -> r b ,
           đ b -> r b b , đ b b -> r b ,
           đ b -> r b b , đ b b -> r b ,
           
           d n   -> d d n ,   t n   -> d n ,
           b m   -> b b m ,   p m   -> b m ,
           g ŋ   -> g g ŋ ,   k ŋ   -> g ŋ ,
!           d n j -> d d n j , t n j -> d n j   || Cns* Vow+ _ Vow ;   ! naive "always cons.grad change" (bad option)
           d n j -> d d n j , t n j -> d n j   || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] Cns* Vow+ _ Vow ; ! change in 2-syll foot
!           d n j -> d d n j , t n j -> d n j   || Cns* Vow+ _ Vow (Cns) (j) .#. ; ! change in final foot

! Of the three options above, 1 gives poorer output. 2 is good if the input has marks for #, 3 is careful

!! This is for 3-syll aktiiva - aktijva (stiiva - stijva already works)
define jvsuff i j v -> i j v v ,
              i s m -> i s s m ,
                e m -> i e b m ,
                á l -> á l l     || Vow+ Cns* _ a [.#.|%#] ;

define finalfoot [s|t] j u v n n a -> s j å v n n å ,
                       m e a n t a -> m æ n n t a ,
                  k a n n t u v r a -> k o n t å v r r å , 
                  e a ŋ ŋ a -> æ ŋ ŋ a ,     
                  e a l l a -> æ l l a ,
                  g r á f a -> g r á f f a ,
                  á s m á -> á s s m á ,
                  f o r a -> f å v r r a ,
                  p e d a -> p i e h t a ,
                  j u r a -> j å v r r å , 
                  h e a p m e -> d i b m e , 
                  s o m a -> s å v m m å ,
                  e a n s a -> æ n s s a ,
                  m á h t a -> m á h t t a ,
                  e a k s t a -> æ k s t a ,
                  e a n t a -> æ n n t a ,
                  i s t a -> i s s t a ,
                  l o s a -> l å v s s å ,
           g r á f a l a s j -> g r a f i j j a l a s j ,
                   i j l a -> i j l l a , 
                   v l e -> v l l e ,
                   p e v t a -> p i e v t t a ,
                   á n s a -> á n s s a ,
                   á h t a -> á h t t a ,
                    d a t -> d a h k a , !this only for nouns, bellodat bellodahka
                  e a r b a -> æ r b b a , 
                   n e a v v u -> n æ v v o , 
                 k e a h t t a -> k æ h t t a , 
                 n e a h t t a -> n æ h t t a , 
                 l e a h t t a -> l æ h t t a ,
                 o v n n a -> å v n n å ,
                 á n a -> á d n a ,
                 l o g a l a s j -> l o g i j j a l a l a s j ,
                  i t e a h t t a -> i t i e h t t a ,  
                     t e   h t   a -> t e h t t a    ||  _ [.#.|%#] ; ! redaksjåvnnåbarggo


!! For longer parts of fairly high frequency:
define parts {máŋgga} -> {moatte} ;


! Here come the other rules

define FinalE i -> e || Syll Cns _ [.#.|%#|%^|%_|%'] ;

define ij    i -> j     || Vow _ ;
define dtj ž ž -> d t j || Vow _ Vow ; 
define ttj č č -> t t j || Vow _ Vow ;
define ssj š š -> s s j || Vow _ Vow ;

define LN   đ m m -> r m ,     đ b m -> r m m ,
            đ ŋ ŋ -> r ŋ ,     đ g ŋ -> r ŋ ŋ ,
            j m m -> j m ,     j b m -> j m m ,
            j n n -> j n ,     j d n -> j n n ,
            j ŋ ŋ -> j ŋ ,     j g ŋ -> j ŋ ŋ ,
            l m m -> l m ,     l b m -> l m m ,
            l n n -> l n ,     l d n -> l n n ,
            l ŋ ŋ -> l ŋ ,     l g ŋ -> l ŋ ŋ ,
            r p m -> r m ,     r b m -> r m m ,
            r t n -> r n ,     r d n -> r n n ,
            r k ŋ -> r ŋ ,     r g ŋ -> r ŋ ŋ ,
            v n n -> v n ,     v d n -> v n n ,
          l n n j -> l n j , l d n j -> l n n j ,
          r t n j -> r n j , r d n j -> r n n j ,
          v n n j -> v n j , v d n j -> v n n j || Vow _ Vow ;

define jNN b m -> m m , d n -> n n || Vow j _ ;




define SK2SSK s p -> s s p   , 
              s t -> s s t   ,
              s k -> s s k   ,
              s m -> s s m   ,
              š t -> s s j t ,
              š k -> s s j k ,
              š m -> s s j m || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%']  Cns* Vow+ ([j|m|n|r|v]) _ Vow ;
define SKK2SK s t t -> s t ,               
              s k k -> s k ,               
              s m m -> s m ,               
              š t t -> š t ,               
              š k k -> š k ,               
              š m m -> š m ||  Vow  ([j|m|n|r|v]) _ Vow ; 

define sl   š -> s , Š -> S || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] _ l ;
define zz z z -> d t s ;
define z    z -> t s ;
define cc   c c -> t t s , č č -> t t j || Vow ([j|l|h|k|n|r|v]) _ Vow ;
define c    c -> t s , č -> t j , Č -> T j || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'|Vow|j|l|h|k|n|r|v] _ Vow ;
define RevDipht u -> u o || _ Cns+ e ;


define eCns i -> e , I -> E ||                   Syll     _ [Cns - j] [%_|%'|.#.|%#] ,
                            [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] Syll Cns _ [Cns - j] [%_|%'|.#.|%#]   ; ! added final bound, check.


!! This rule is only used for verbs:
define it   e -> i || Syll _ t [%_|%'|.#.] ; ! Loan word rule!!

!! These rules are only used for adjs:
define adjHasFinalT [ {cahkka} | {duolba} | {duolbba} | {duolla} | {gilga} | {gilgga} | {guovga} | {guovgga} | {jalga} | {jalgga} | {jaska} | {jasska} | {jorba} | {jårbbå} | {lossa} | {låsså} | {njahpi} | {njuolga} | {njuolgga} | {njuvgga} | {njárba} | {njárbba} | {roahkka} | {russjka} | {ruška} | {ráhpa} | {sjalla} | {snávga} | {suodja} | {suohka} | {sáhppa} | {sárgga} | {tjavgga} | {tjuodna} | {tjuorgga} | {tjuovgga} | {tjáhppa} | {tjårggå} | {vielga} | {vielgga} | {viska} | {visska} | {šalla} | {čavga} | {čorga} | {čuorga} | {čuotna} | {čuovga} | {čáhppa} 
       ! these last five exceptions were from the test set, need checking:
       | {girjja} | {čeaska} | {lášma} | {šearra} | {vuovtta} ] ; 
